Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.423

Miscellaneous state funds or accounts—Moneys transferred to state general fund.

All moneys to the credit of the following state funds or accounts as of September 8, 1975 are transferred to the state general fund on that date:

(1) The public school building construction account of the general fund created under RCW 43.79.330; and

(2) The general administration construction fund in the general fund created under *RCW 43.82.090.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 91 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.82.090 was repealed by 1994 c 219 s 20.